Massachusetts, session 194th, S1912.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, Section 111F of Chapter 41
of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following new paragraph at the end
thereof:-
For any police officer or fire fighter subject to this section, who is granted an accidental
disability retirement, pursuant to Section 7 of Chapter 32, and said accidental disability
retirement is not based on presumptions pursuant to Sections 94, 94A or 94B of Chapter 32, any
absence from duty caused by the condition which resulted in said accidental disability retirement,
pursuant to Section 7 of Chapter 32, shall be regarded as leave pursuant to this section. If said
police officer or fire fighter was not previously granted leave pursuant to this section, he or she
shall have such absence retroactively so granted, and any pay or other personnel actions
of 2

implicated by such retroactive granting of leave pursuant to this section shall be taken by the
employer.
of 2